Massachusetts, session 194th, S2103.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 45 of Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking clause(m) and inserting in place thereof the following:
“(m) The state secretary shall automatically disqualify a person convicted of a felony or
misdemeanor in violation of chapter 3, chapter 55 or chapter 268A or comparable offense under
federal law or the law of another state from registering as an executive or legislative agent for a
period of 10 years from the date of conviction".
of 1